Louisiana, session 2026, HB806.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:100(B)(2) and (D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§100. Hit-and-run driving
* * *
B. For the purpose of this Section:
* * *
(2) "Louisiana Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (LLETS)"
means a system that is established and overseen by the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections, office of state police, and provides for statewide dissemination of
system-generated notifications to all Louisiana law enforcement agencies.
* * *
D.(1) This Subsection shall be cited as "Jody's Law". In all cases alleging
a violation of this Section, the court shall use the factors provided in Code of
Criminal Procedure Article 316 to set bail. No fixed bail schedule may be used in
setting bail.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 806 ENROLLED
(2) Law enforcement agencies responsible for investigating hit-and-run
driving offenses shall adopt protocols and procedures to rapidly notify other law
enforcement agencies of all of the following:
(a) That a hit-and-run offense has occurred.
(b) If known, whether any injuries were reported.
(c) If known, the make, model, and license plate number of the vehicle
driven by a person who committed a hit-and-run driving offense.
(d) If known, the direction of travel of the vehicle driven by the person who
committed a hit-and-run driving offense.
(3) The law enforcement agency investigating a hit-and-run driving offense
shall utilize the Louisiana Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (LLETS)
to disseminate the information required by Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is authorized and directed to
alphabetize and renumber the definitions contained in R.S. 14:100(B) and to correct any
cross references to the renumbered paragraphs if necessary.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.